Maryland, session 2026, SB0838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0838*

SENATE BILL 838
Article – Health – General
21–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b–2) “Cottage food product” means a [nonhazardous] NONPOTENTIALLY
HAZARDOUS food, as specified in regulations adopted by the Department, that is sold in
the State in accordance with § 21–330.1 of this subtitle and regulations adopted by the
Department:
(1) Directly to a consumer from a residence, at a farmer’s market, at a
public event, by personal delivery, or by mail delivery; or
(2) To a retail food store, including a grocery store, or a food cooperative.
(g) (3) “Food processing plant” does not include:
(i) A warehouse or distribution center that:
1. Does not process food; and
2. Stores only sealed containers of whole bean, ground or
instant coffee, leaf or instant teas, nondairy dehydrated whiteners, sugar, or sugar–free
sweeteners; [or]
(ii) A cottage food business; OR
(III) A HOME BAKERY.
(h) (3) “Food service facility” does not include:
(i) A kitchen in a private home where food is prepared at no charge
for guests in the home, for guests at a social gathering, or for service to unemployed,
homeless, or other disadvantaged populations;
(ii) A food preparation or serving area where food is prepared or
served only by an excluded organization;
(iii) A location in a farmer’s market or at a public festival or event
where raw agricultural products, as defined in § 21–304(d)(1)(iii) of this subtitle, are sold;
[or]
(iv) A cottage food business; OR

SENATE BILL 838 3
(V) A HOME BAKERY.
(H–1) “HOME BAKERY” MEANS A BUSINESS THAT:
(1) PRODUCES OR PACKAGES HOME BAKERY PRODUCTS IN A
RESIDENTIAL KITCHEN;
(2) SELLS THE HOME BAKERY PRODUCTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
21–330.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
AND
(3) HAS ANNUAL REVENUES FROM THE SALE OF HOME BAKERY
PRODUCTS IN AN AMOUNT NOT EXCEEDING $50,000.
(H–2) “HOME BAKERY PRODUCT” MEANS A NONPOTENTIALLY HAZARDOUS OR
POTENTIALLY HAZARDOUS FOOD, AS SPECIFIED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, THAT IS:
(1) BREAD, A CAKE, A PIE, A COOKIE, A CRACKER, A DOUGHNUT, A
MUFFIN, A PASTRY, A PIZZA CRUST, OR ANY OTHER SIMILAR BAKED GOOD, WHETHER
PARTIALLY OR COMPLETELY BAKED; AND
(2) SOLD IN THE STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–330.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) DIRECTLY TO A CONSUMER FROM A RESIDENCE, AT A
FARMER’S MARKET, AT A PUBLIC EVENT, BY PERSONAL DELIVERY, OR BY MAIL
DELIVERY; OR
(II) TO A RETAIL FOOD STORE, INCLUDING A GROCERY STORE,
OR A FOOD COOPERATIVE.
21–330.1.
(a) This section does not:
(1) Apply to a food establishment that is required to have a license under §
21–305 of this subtitle; or
(2) Exempt a cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY from any applicable
State or federal tax laws.

SENATE BILL 838
(b) A cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY is not required to be licensed by
the Department if the owner of the cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY complies with
this section.
(c) The owner of a cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY may sell only cottage
food OR HOME BAKERY products that are:
(1) Stored on the premises of the cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY;
and
(2) Prepackaged with a label that contains:
(i) The following information:
1. A. The name and address of the cottage food business
OR HOME BAKERY; or
B. The name and phone number of the cottage food business
OR HOME BAKERY and the identification number assigned to the cottage food business OR
HOME BAKERY under subsection (d) of this section;
2. The name of the cottage food product OR HOME BAKERY
PRODUCT;
3. The ingredients of the cottage food product OR HOME
BAKERY PRODUCT in descending order of the amount of each ingredient by weight;
4. The net weight or net volume of the cottage food product
OR HOME BAKERY PRODUCT;
5. Allergen information as specified by federal labeling
requirements; and
6. If any nutritional claim is made, nutritional information
as specified by federal labeling requirements;
(ii) The following statement printed in 10 point or larger type in a
color that provides a clear contrast to the background of the label: “Made by a cottage food
business OR HOME BAKERY that is not subject to Maryland’s food safety regulations.”; and
(iii) For a cottage food product OR HOME BAKERY PRODUCT offered
for sale at a retail food store:
1. The phone number and e–mail address of the cottage food
business OR HOME BAKERY; and

SENATE BILL 838 5
2. The date the cottage food product OR HOME BAKERY
PRODUCT was made.
(d) At the request of a cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY, the Department
shall provide to the cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY a unique identification
number that the cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY may use on the label of a cottage
food product OR HOME BAKERY PRODUCT under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) The owner of a cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY shall comply with all
applicable county and municipal laws and ordinances regulating the preparation,
processing, storage, and sale of cottage food products OR HOME BAKERY PRODUCTS.
(f) (1) The Department may investigate any complaint alleging that a cottage
food business OR HOME BAKERY has violated this section.
(2) On receipt of a complaint, a representative of the Department, at a
reasonable time, may enter and inspect the premises of a cottage food business OR HOME
BAKERY to determine compliance with this section.
(3) The owner of a cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY may not:
(i) Refuse to grant access to a representative who requests to enter
and inspect the premises of the cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY under paragraph
(2) of this subsection; or
(ii) Interfere with any inspection under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(4) An investigation of a cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY
conducted under this subsection may include sampling of a cottage food product OR HOME
BAKERY PRODUCT to determine if the cottage food product OR HOME BAKERY PRODUCT
is misbranded or adulterated.
(g) Before the owner of a cottage food business OR HOME BAKERY may sell a
cottage food product OR HOME BAKERY PRODUCT to a retail food store, the owner shall
submit to the Department:
(1) Documentation of the owner’s successful completion of a food safety
course approved by the Department; and
(2) The label that will be affixed to the cottage food product OR HOME
BAKERY PRODUCT in accordance with subsection (c)(2) of this section.
(h) Beginning on or before December 30, 2020, and every December 30 thereafter,
the Department shall report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health [and

SENATE BILL 838
Government Operations] Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on:
(1) The documentation and labels submitted under subsection (f) of this
section; and
(2) Any complaints received by the Department related to a cottage food
business [or], cottage food product, HOME BAKERY, OR HOME BAKERY PRODUCT.
(i) The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.